Kentucky statutes. TITLE LI Unified Juvenile Code
CHAPTER 620 Dependency, Neglect, and Abuse
620.055.
External child fatality and near fatality review panel — Creation — Members — Meetings — Duties — Responsibilities — Information required to be provided to members — Report and Response — Annual reports — Confidentiality — Destruction of information following conclusion of panel's examination — Application of open records and open meetings law — Limitation of liability — Proceedings are privileged — Annual evaluation of panel's work. [Effective January 1, 2023]

An external child fatality and near fatality review panel is hereby created and established for the purpose of conducting comprehensive reviews of child fatalities and near fatalities, reported to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, suspected to be a result of abuse or neglect. The panel shall be attached to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet for staff and administrative purposes.

The external child fatality and near fatality review panel shall be composed of the following five (5) ex officio nonvoting members and seventeen (17) voting members:

Two (2) members of the Kentucky General Assembly, one (1) appointed by the President of the Senate and one (1) appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, who shall be ex officio nonvoting members;

The commissioner of the Department for Community Based Services, who shall be an ex officio nonvoting member;

The commissioner of the Department for Public Health, who shall be an ex officio nonvoting member;

A family court judge selected by the Chief Justice of the Kentucky Supreme Court, who shall be an ex officio nonvoting members;

A pediatrician from the University of Kentucky's Department of Pediatrics who is licensed and experienced in forensic medicine relating to child abuse and neglect to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the dean of the University of Kentucky School of Medicine;

A pediatrician from the University of Louisville's Department of Pediatrics who is licensed and experienced in forensic medicine relating to child abuse and neglect to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the dean of the University of Louisville School of Medicine;

The state medical examiner or designee;

A court-appointed special advocate (CASA) program director to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the Kentucky CASA Association;

A peace officer with experience investigating child abuse and neglect fatalities and near fatalities to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the commissioner of the Kentucky State Police;

A representative from Prevent Child Abuse Kentucky, Inc. to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the president of the Prevent Child Abuse Kentucky, Inc. board of directors;

A practicing local prosecutor to be selected by the Attorney General;

The executive director of the Kentucky Domestic Violence Association or the executive director's designee;

The chairperson of the State Child Fatality Review Team established in accordance with KRS

211.684

or the chairperson's designee;

A practicing social work clinician to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the Board of Social Work;

A practicing addiction counselor to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the Kentucky Association of Addiction Professionals;

A representative from the family resource and youth service centers to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

A representative of a community mental health center to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the Kentucky Association of Regional Mental Health and Mental Retardation Programs, Inc.;

A member of a citizen foster care review board selected by the Chief Justice of the Kentucky Supreme Court;

An at-large representative who shall serve as chairperson to be selected by the Secretary of State;

The president of the Kentucky Coroners Association; and

A practicing medication-assisted treatment provider to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure.

By August 1, 2013, the appointing authority or the appointing authorities, as the case may be, shall have appointed panel members. Initial terms of members, other than those serving ex officio, shall be staggered to provide continuity. Initial appointments shall be: five (5) members for terms of one (1) year, five (5) members for terms of two (2) years, and five (5) members for terms of three (3) years, these terms to expire, in each instance, on June 30 and thereafter until a successor is appointed and accepts appointment.

Upon the expiration of these initial staggered terms, successors shall be appointed by the respective appointing authorities, for terms of two (2) years, and until successors are appointed and accept their appointments. Members shall be eligible for reappointment. Vacancies in the membership of the panel shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

At any time, a panel member shall recuse himself or herself from the review of a case if the panel member believes he or she has a personal or private conflict of interest.

If a voting panel member is absent from two (2) or more consecutive, regularly scheduled meetings, the member shall be considered to have resigned and shall be replaced with a new member in the same manner as the original appointment.

If a voting panel member is proven to have violated subsection (13) of this section, the member shall be removed from the panel, and the member shall be replaced with a new member in the same manner as the original appointment.

The panel shall meet at least quarterly and may meet upon the call of the chairperson of the panel.

Members of the panel shall receive no compensation for their duties related to the panel, but may be reimbursed for expenses incurred in accordance with state guidelines and administrative regulations.

Each panel member shall be provided copies of all information set out in this subsection, including but not limited to records and information, upon request, to be gathered, unredacted, and submitted to the panel within thirty (30) days by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services from the Department for Community Based Services or any agency, organization, or entity involved with a child subject to a fatality or near fatality:

Cabinet for Health and Family Services records and documentation regarding the deceased or injured child and his or her caregivers, residents of the home, and persons supervising the child at the time of the incident that include all records and documentation set out in this paragraph:

All prior and ongoing investigations, services, or contacts;

Any and all records of services to the family provided by agencies or individuals contracted by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and

All documentation of actions taken as a result of child fatality internal reviews conducted pursuant to KRS 620.050(12)(b);

Licensing reports from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, Office of Inspector General, if an incident occurred in a licensed facility;

All available records regarding protective services provided out of state;

All records of services provided by the Department for Juvenile Justice regarding the deceased or injured child and his or her caregivers, residents of the home, and persons involved with the child at the time of the incident;

Autopsy reports;

Emergency medical service, fire department, law enforcement, coroner, and other first responder reports, including but not limited to photos and interviews with family members and witnesses;

Medical records regarding the deceased or injured child, including but not limited to all records and documentation set out in this paragraph:

Primary care records, including progress notes; developmental milestones; growth charts that include head circumference; all laboratory and X-ray requests and results; and birth record that includes record of delivery type, complications, and initial physical exam of baby;

In-home provider care notes about observations of the family, bonding, others in home, and concerns;

Hospitalization and emergency department records;

Dental records;

Specialist records; and

All photographs of injuries of the child that are available;

Educational records of the deceased or injured child, or other children residing in the home where the incident occurred, including but not limited to the records and documents set out in this paragraph:

Attendance records;

Special education services;

School-based health records; and

Documentation of any interaction and services provided to the children and family.

The release of educational records shall be in compliance with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20

U.S.C. sec. 1232

g and its implementing regulations;

Head Start records or records from any other child care or early child care provider;

Records of any Family, Circuit, or District Court involvement with the deceased or injured child and his or her caregivers, residents of the home and persons involved with the child at the time of the incident that include but are not limited to the juvenile and family court records and orders set out in this paragraph, pursuant to KRS Chapters 199, 403, 405, 406, and 600 to 645:

Petitions;

Court reports by the Department for Community Based Services, guardian ad litem, court-appointed special advocate, and the Citizen Foster Care Review Board;

All orders of the court, including temporary, dispositional, or adjudicatory; and

Documentation of annual or any other review by the court;

Home visit records from the Department for Public Health or other services;

All information on prior allegations of abuse or neglect and deaths of children of adults residing in the household;

All law enforcement records and documentation regarding the deceased or injured child and his or her caregivers, residents of the home, and persons involved with the child at the time of the incident; and

Mental health records regarding the deceased or injured child and his or her caregivers, residents of the home, and persons involved with the child at the time of the incident.

The panel may seek the advice of experts, such as persons specializing in the fields of psychiatric and forensic medicine, nursing, psychology, social work, education, law enforcement, family law, or other related fields, if the facts of a case warrant additional expertise.

The panel shall post updates after each meeting to the Web site of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet regarding case reviews, findings, and recommendations.

The panel chairperson, or other requested persons, shall report a summary of the panel’s discussions and proposed or actual recommendations to the Interim Joint Committee on Health and Welfare of the Kentucky General Assembly monthly or at the request of a committee co-chair. The goal of the committee shall be to ensure impartiality regarding the operations of the panel during its review process.

The panel shall publish an annual report by February 1 of each year consisting of case reviews, findings, and recommendations for system and process improvements to help prevent child fatalities and near fatalities that are due to abuse and neglect. The report shall be submitted to the Governor, the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, the Attorney General, the State Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention Board established pursuant to KRS

15.905

, and the director of the Legislative Research Commission for distribution to the Interim Joint Committee on Health, Welfare, and Family Services, and the Interim Joint Committee on Judiciary.

The panel shall determine which agency is responsible for implementing each recommendation, and shall forward each recommendation in writing to the appropriate agency.

Any agency that receives a recommendation from the panel shall, within ninety (90) days of receipt:

Respond to the panel with a written notice of intent to implement the recommendation, an explanation of how the recommendation will be implemented, and an approximate time frame of implementation; or

Respond to the panel with a written notice that the agency does not intend to implement the recommendation, and a detailed explanation of why the recommendation cannot be implemented.

Information and record copies that are confidential under state or federal law and are provided to the external child fatality and near fatality review panel by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the Department for Community Based Services, or any agency, organization, or entity for review shall not become the information and records of the panel and shall not lose their confidentiality by virtue of the panel’s access to the information and records. The original information and records used to generate information and record copies provided to the panel in accordance with subsection (6) of this section shall be maintained by the appropriate agency in accordance with state and federal law and shall be subject to the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

. All open records requests shall be made to the appropriate agency, not to the external child fatality and near fatality review panel or any of the panel members. Information and record copies provided to the panel for review shall be exempt from the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

. At the conclusion of the panel’s examination, all copies of information and records provided to the panel involving an individual case shall be destroyed by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portions of the external child fatality and near fatality review panel meetings during which an individual child fatality or near fatality case is reviewed or discussed by panel members may be a closed session and subject to the provisions of KRS 61.815(1) and shall only occur following the conclusion of an open session. At the conclusion of the closed session, the panel shall immediately convene an open session and give a summary of what occurred during the closed session.

Each member of the external child fatality and near fatality review panel, any person attending a closed panel session, and any person presenting information or records on an individual child fatality or near fatality shall not release information or records not available under the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

to the public.

A member of the external child fatality and near fatality review panel shall not be prohibited from making a good faith report to any state or federal agency of any information or issue that the panel member believes should be reported or disclosed in an effort to facilitate effectiveness and transparency in Kentucky’s child protective services.

A member of the external child fatality and near fatality review panel shall not be held liable for any civil damages or criminal penalties pursuant to KRS

620.990

as a result of any action taken or omitted in the performance of the member’s duties pursuant to this section and KRS

620.050

, except for violations of subsection (11), (12), or (13) of this section.

The proceedings, records, opinions, and deliberations of the external child fatality and near fatality review panel shall be privileged and shall not be subject to discovery, subpoena, or introduction into evidence in any civil or criminal actions in any manner that would directly or indirectly identify specific persons or cases reviewed by the panel. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict or limit the right to discover or use in any civil action any evidence that is discoverable independent of the proceedings of the panel.

The Legislative Oversight and Investigations Committee of the Kentucky General Assembly shall conduct an annual evaluation of the external child fatality and near fatality review panel established pursuant to this section to monitor the operations, procedures, and recommendations of the panel and shall report its findings to the General Assembly.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 39, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2018 ch. 159, § 55, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 14, § 10, effective March 12, 2021; 2022 ch. 75, § 18, effective April 1, 2022; 2022 ch. 139, § 2, effective July 14, 2022; 2022 ch. 211, § 30, effective January 1, 2023; 2022 ch. 223, § 14, effective January 1, 2023.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2023). This statute was amended by 2022 Ky. Acts chs. 75, 139, 211, and 223, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

620.060.
Emergency custody orders.

The court for the county where the child ordinarily resides or will reside or the county where the child is present may issue an ex parte emergency custody order when it appears to the court that removal is in the best interest of the child and that there are reasonable grounds to believe, as supported by affidavit or by recorded sworn testimony, that one (1) or more of the following conditions exist and that the parents or other person exercising custodial control or supervision are unable or unwilling to protect the child:

The child is in danger of imminent death or serious physical injury or is being sexually abused;

The parent has repeatedly inflicted or allowed to be inflicted by other than accidental means physical injury or emotional injury. This condition shall not include reasonable and ordinary discipline recognized in the community where the child lives, as long as reasonable and ordinary discipline does not result in abuse or neglect as defined in KRS 600.020(1); or

The child is in immediate danger due to the parent’s failure or refusal to provide for the safety or needs of the child.

Custody may be placed with a relative taking into account the wishes of the custodial parent and child or any other appropriate person or agency including the cabinet.

An emergency custody order shall be effective no longer than seventy-two (72) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, unless there is a temporary removal hearing with oral or other notice to the county attorney and the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child, to determine if the child should be held for a longer period. The seventy-two (72) hour period also may be extended or delayed upon the waiver or request of the child’s parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision.

Any person authorized to serve process shall serve the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision with a copy of the emergency custody order. If such person cannot be found, the sheriff shall make a good faith effort to notify the nearest known relative, neighbor, or other person familiar with the child.

Within seventy-two (72) hours of the taking of a child into custody without the consent of his parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision, a petition shall be filed pursuant to this chapter.

Nothing herein shall preclude the issuance of arrest warrants pursuant to the Rules of Criminal Procedure.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 67, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 46, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 57, § 4, effective March 17, 1998; 2018 ch. 159, § 20, effective July 14, 2018.

620.070.
Dependency, neglect, or abuse action — Service of petition and summons — Contents of summons.

A dependency, neglect, or abuse action may be commenced by the filing of a petition by any interested person in the juvenile session of the District Court.

After a petition has been filed, the clerk of the court shall issue, and the sheriff or other person authorized to serve process, except an employee of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall serve, a copy of the petition and a summons to the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision, unless their identity or location is unknown, in which case the petition and summons shall be served as directed by the court, which means may include service on the nearest known adult relative, service by mail to the last known address, or other service directed by the court and given in a manner reasonably calculated to give actual notice. Service may be by warning order if other means are not effective.

The summons shall include an explanation of the importance of the petition and an explanation of the rights of the parent or other person exercising custodial control in any subsequent proceedings. The summons shall emphasize the importance of immediately contacting the court about legal representation and to be advised of the date, time, and place when the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision is to appear before the court. The summons shall include written notification that the case may be reviewed by a local citizen foster care review board and the report of the board review shall become part of the court record.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 68, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 47, effective April 10, 1988; 1992, ch. 412, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 301, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 278, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2018 ch. 159, § 21, effective July 14, 2018.

620.072.
Unannounced home visits concerning abused or neglected child — Conditions requiring — Request for assistance in gaining access to child.

If the cabinet’s initial determination as to the risk of harm to and immediate safety of an abused or neglected child as defined in KRS

600.020

requires an investigation pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet, including consideration of information on the nature and extent of a present danger or threat of danger to the child or cabinet staff, and if the investigation requires a visit to the residence or location where the reported abuse or neglect occurred, the cabinet shall make the visit unannounced, in addition to any other actions taken to protect the child.

If the initial visit is necessary, after it is completed, the cabinet shall incorporate unannounced visits with any necessary scheduled visits until the welfare of the child has been safeguarded in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet.

If there is reason to believe a child is in imminent danger, or if a parent or caretaker of a child refuses the cabinet entry to a child’s home or refuses to allow a child to be interviewed, the cabinet may request assistance:

From law enforcement; or

Through a request for a court order pursuant to KRS 620.040(5)(a).

A school or a child-care provider shall provide the cabinet access to a child subject to an investigation without parental consent.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 188, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2017).
2017 Ky. Acts ch. 188, sec. 2 provided that this statute created in
2017 Ky. Acts ch. 188, sec. 1 may be cited as the Tucker Act.

620.080.
Temporary removal hearing.

Unless waived by the child and his parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision, a temporary removal hearing shall be held:

Within seventy-two (72) hours, excluding weekends and holidays, of the time when an emergency custody order is issued or when a child is taken into custody without the consent of his parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision; and

In cases commenced by the filing of a petition, within ten (10) days of the date of filing.

At a temporary removal hearing, the court shall determine whether there are reasonable grounds to believe that the child would be dependent, neglected or abused if returned to or left in the custody of his parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision even though it is not proved conclusively who has perpetrated the dependency, neglect or abuse. For good cause, the court may allow hearsay evidence. The Commonwealth shall bear the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence and if the Commonwealth should fail to establish same, the child shall be released to or retained in the custody of his parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 69, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 48, effective April 10, 1988.

620.090.
Temporary custody orders.

If, after completion of the temporary removal hearing, the court finds there are reasonable grounds to believe the child is dependent, neglected or abused, the court shall:

Issue an order for temporary removal and shall grant temporary custody to the cabinet or other appropriate person or agency. Preference shall be given to available and qualified relatives of the child considering the wishes of the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision, if known. The order shall state the specific reasons for removal and show that alternative less restrictive placements and services have been considered. The court may recommend a placement for the child;

Inquire as to an existing child support order; and

If there is no existing order, or if the order is to be amended, the court shall:

Make specific findings, either written or on the record, as to:

The child support obligation in the best interest of the child;

The action to be taken by the payee, payor, or any other party by making an application for services to the child support office who shall take all appropriate action; or

Setting a hearing as soon as practicable; and

Require proper service before establishing a new child support order.

In placing a child under an order of temporary custody, the cabinet or its designee shall use the least restrictive appropriate placement available. Preference shall be given to available and qualified relatives of the child considering the wishes of the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision, if known. The child may also be placed in a facility or program operated or approved by the cabinet, including a foster home, or any other appropriate available placement. However, under no circumstance shall the child be placed in a home, facility, or other shelter with a child who has been committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice for commission of a sex crime as that term is defined in KRS

17.500

, unless the child committed for the commission of a sex crime is kept segregated from other children in the home, facility, or other shelter that have not been committed for the commission of a sex crime.

If the court finds there are not reasonable grounds to believe the child is dependent, neglected or abused, or if no action is taken within seventy-two (72) hours, the emergency custody order shall be dissolved automatically and the cabinet or its designee shall return the child to the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision. A request for a continuance of the hearing by the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision shall constitute action precluding automatic dissolution of the emergency custody order.

When the court issues a temporary order for the custody of a child, the court may order that, within two (2) weeks, arrangements be made for the child to receive a thorough medical, visual, and dental examination by a professional authorized by the Kentucky Revised Statutes to conduct such examinations. The costs of the examination shall be paid by the cabinet.

The child shall remain in temporary custody with the cabinet for a period of time not to exceed forty-five (45) days from the date of the removal from his home. The court shall conduct the adjudicatory hearing and shall make a final disposition within forty-five (45) days of the removal of the child. The court may extend such time after making written findings establishing the need for the extension and after finding that the extension is in the child’s best interest.

If custody is granted to a grandparent of the child pursuant to this section, the court shall consider granting reasonable visitation rights to any other grandparent of the child if the court determines the grandparent has a significant and viable relationship with the child as established in KRS 405.021(1)(c).

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 70, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 49, effective April 10, 1988; 2006, ch. 182, § 51, effective July 12, 2006; 2018 ch. 197, § 2, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 47, § 5, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 122, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

620.095.
Restriction on placement of nonoffender.

A nonoffender, as defined in KRS

600.020

, shall not be placed in secure or nonsecure detention.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 87, § 6, effective July 15, 2008.

620.100.
Appointment of separate counsel — Court-appointed special advocate volunteer — Full adjudicatory hearing — Notice of proceedings — Separate counsel to advise cabinet employee.

If the court determines, as a result of a temporary removal hearing, that further proceedings are required, the court shall advise the child and his parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision of their right to appointment of separate counsel:

The court shall appoint counsel for the child to be paid for by the Finance and Administration Cabinet. Counsel shall document participation in training on the role of counsel that includes training in early childhood, child, and adolescent development. The clerk of the court shall arrange for service on all parties, including the local representative of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, of the order appointing counsel. The fee to be fixed by the court shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500); however, if the action has final disposition in the District Court, the fee shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250);

The court shall appoint separate counsel for the parent who exercises custodial control or supervision if the parent is unable to afford counsel pursuant to KRS Chapter 31. The clerk of the court shall arrange for service on all parties, including the local representative of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, of the order appointing counsel. The parent’s counsel shall be provided or paid for by the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The fee to be fixed by the court shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500); however, if the action has final disposition in the District Court, the fee shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250);

The court shall appoint separate counsel for a person claiming to be a de facto custodian, as defined in KRS

403.270

, if the person is unable to afford counsel pursuant to KRS Chapter 31. The clerk of the court shall arrange for service on all parties, including the local representative of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, of the order appointing counsel. The person’s counsel shall be provided or paid for by the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The fee to be fixed by the court shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500); however, if the action has final disposition in the District Court, the fee shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250);

The court may, in the interest of justice, appoint separate counsel for a nonparent who exercises custodial control or supervision of the child, if the person is unable to afford counsel, pursuant to KRS Chapter 31. The clerk of the court shall arrange for service on all parties, including the local representative of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, of the order appointing counsel. Counsel for the person shall be provided or paid for by the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The fee to be fixed by the court shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500); however, if the action has final disposition in the District Court, the fee shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250); and

The court may, in the interest of justice, appoint a court-appointed special advocate volunteer to represent the best interests of the child pursuant to KRS

620.500

to

620.550

. The clerk of the court shall arrange for service on all parties, including the local representative of the cabinet, of the order appointing the court-appointed special advocate volunteer.

If the court determines that further proceedings are required, the court also shall advise the child and his parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision that they have a right to not incriminate themselves, and a right to a full adjudicatory hearing at which they may confront and cross-examine all adverse witnesses, present evidence on their own behalf and to an appeal.

The adjudication shall determine the truth or falsity of the allegations in the complaint. The burden of proof shall be upon the complainant, and a determination of dependency, neglect, and abuse shall be made by a preponderance of the evidence. The Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure shall apply.

The disposition shall determine the action to be taken by the court on behalf of the child and his parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision.

Foster parents, preadoptive parents, or relatives providing care for the child shall receive notice of, and shall have a right to be heard in, any proceeding held with respect to the child. This subsection shall not be construed to require that a foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative caring for the child be made a party to a proceeding solely on the basis of the notice and right to be heard.

If the court determines that further proceedings are required, the court shall, in the interest of justice, have the ability to request that separate counsel is available to advise a cabinet employee in court anytime that the cabinet employee is required to be in court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 71, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 50, effective April 10, 1988; 1992, ch. 241, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 245, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 618, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 666, effective June 20, 2005; 2013, ch. 79, § 7, effective June 25, 2013; 2018 ch. 159, § 47, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 180, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

620.110.
Petition for immediate entitlement to custody.

Any person aggrieved by the issuance of a temporary removal order may file a petition in Circuit Court for immediate entitlement to custody and a hearing shall be expeditiously held according to the Rules of Civil Procedure. During the pendency of the petition for immediate entitlement the orders of the District Court shall remain in effect.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 72, effective July 1, 1987.

620.120.
Criminal charges tried separately.

In cases where criminal charges arising out of the same transaction or occurrence are filed against an adult alleged to be the perpetrator of child abuse or neglect, such charges shall be tried separately from the adjudicatory hearing held pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 73, effective July 1, 1987.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Juvenile Code Proceedings, § 258.00.

620.125.
Testimony in adjudication not admissible in criminal proceeding except for purposes of impeachment.

Testimony offered by an alleged responsible parent or person exercising custodial control or supervision in an adjudication of a petition under this chapter for dependency, abuse, or neglect shall not be admissible in any criminal proceeding for charges arising from the same transaction or occurrence except for the purposes of impeachment.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 159, § 17, effective July 14, 2018.

620.130.
Alternatives to removal from custody.

In any proceeding under this chapter, when the court is petitioned to remove or continue the removal of a child from the custody of his parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision, the court shall first consider whether the child may be reasonably protected against the alleged dependency, neglect or abuse, by alternatives less restrictive than removal. Such alternatives may include, but shall not be limited to, the provision of medical, educational, psychiatric, psychological, social work, counseling, day care, or homemaking services with monitoring wherever necessary by the cabinet or other appropriate agency. Where the court specifically finds that such alternatives are adequate to reasonably protect the child against the alleged dependency, neglect or abuse, the court shall not order the removal or continued removal of the child.

If the court orders the removal or continues the removal of the child, services provided to the parent and the child shall be designed to promote the protection of the child and the return of the child safely to the child’s home as soon as possible. The cabinet shall develop a treatment plan for each child designed to meet the needs of the child. The cabinet may change the child’s placement or treatment plan as the cabinet may require. The cabinet shall notify the committing court of the change, in writing, within fourteen (14) days after the change has been implemented.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 74, effective July 1, 1987; 1998, ch. 57, § 5, effective March 17, 1998.